North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-16.1 Operation of Water Resource Districts
61-16.1-38.
Permit to construct or modify dam, dike, or other device required — Penalty — Emergency.

No dikes, dams, or other devices for water conservation, flood control regulation, watershed improvement, or storage of water which are capable of retaining, obstructing, or diverting more than fifty acre-feet [61674.08 cubic meters] of water or twenty-five acre-feet [30837.04 cubic meters] of water for a medium-hazard or high-hazard dam, may be constructed within any district except in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. An application for the construction of any dike, dam, or other device, along with complete plans and specifications, must be presented first to the department of water resources. Except for low-hazard dams less than ten feet [3.05 meters] in height or agricultural dikes less than two feet [0.61 meters] in height, the plans and specifications must be completed by a professional engineer registered in this state. After receipt, the department shall consider the application in such detail as the department deems necessary and proper. The department shall refuse to allow the construction of any unsafe or improper dike, dam, or other device which would interfere with the orderly control of the water resources of the district, or may order changes, conditions, or modifications as in the judgment of the department may be necessary for safety or the protection of property. Within forty-five days after receipt of the application, except in unique or complex situations, the department shall complete the initial review of the application and forward the application, along with any changes, conditions, or modifications, to the water resource board of the district within which the contemplated project is located. The board shall consider the application within forty-five days, and suggest any changes, conditions, or modifications to the department. If the board approves the application, the board shall forward the approved application to the department. If the board fails to respond within forty-five days, the board will be deemed to have no changes, conditions, or modifications to make. The department shall make the final decision on the application and forward that decision to the applicant and the local water resource board. The department may issue temporary permits for dikes, dams, or other devices in cases of an emergency. Any person constructing a dam, dike, or other device capable of retaining, obstructing, or diverting more than fifty acre-feet [61674.08 cubic meters] of water or twenty-five acre-feet [30837.04 cubic meters] of water for a medium-hazard or high-hazard dam, without first securing a permit to do so, as required by this section, is liable for all damages proximately caused by the dam, dike, or other device, and is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1985, ch. 669, § 3; 1997, ch. 519, § 1; 2003, ch. 550, § 3; 2013, ch. 483, § 1; 2019, ch. 510, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 488, § 150, effective August 1, 2021.

61-16.1-39.
Dams or other devices constructed within a district shall come under control of a water resource board.

All dams, dikes, and other water conservation and flood control works or devices constructed within any district, unless specifically exempted, are under the jurisdiction of the water resource board for the district within which the dam, dike, works, or device exists or is to be constructed. The district’s jurisdiction over the dam, dike, works, or device does not affect the commission’s or department’s authority relative to the dam, dike, works, or device. No changes or modification of any existing dams, dikes, or other works or devices may be made without complying fully with the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 2021, ch. 488, § 151, effective August 1, 2021.

61-16.1-39.1.
Petition for maintenance — Bond required.

A written petition for maintenance of a project other than an assessment drain may be made to the board under this section. The petition shall designate the maintenance requested. The petition must be signed by six, or if a majority is less than six, by a majority of the landowners within the area benefited by the project. The petitioners shall supply a surety bond in the amount of two hundred fifty dollars. The bond must be for the payment of costs if the board finds the petition was improvidently made.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 744, § 1.

61-16.1-39.2.
Maintenance of project — Exception.

If, upon receipt of a petition meeting the requirements of section 61-16.1-39.1, or upon the board’s own motion, the board determines a project established under the provisions of this chapter requires maintenance, the board may provide the required maintenance by using the same method used initially to finance the project. Unless otherwise provided by law or agreement, the participation of the state in financing the initial project does not bind the state to finance any maintenance. Any maintenance financed through special assessments may not exceed the maximum levy established by section 61-16.1-45. This section does not apply to maintenance of assessment drains.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 744, § 2.

61-16.1-40.
When dams constructed by federal agency under control of district.

Any dam, dike, or other water control device or flood control project constructed by or with the assistance of any federal agency but which is not maintained or operated by any federal agency shall become the responsibility of the district where it is located. The district may take any action concerning this dam, dike, or other water control device it deems feasible or necessary.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-40.1.
Maintenance of federally constructed projects — Assessment district established.

With regard to projects constructed by a federal agency, including the soil conservation service or natural resources conservation service, the water resource board may finance in whole or in part the maintenance of the project with funds raised through the collection of a special assessment levied against the land and premises benefited by maintenance of the project. The assessments to be levied may not exceed four dollars per acre [.40 hectare] annually on agricultural lands and may not exceed two dollars annually for each five hundred dollars of taxable valuation of nonagricultural property. No action is required for the establishment of the assessment district or the assessments except the water resource board must approve the maintenance and assessment therefor by a vote of two-thirds of the members and the board of county commissioners of the county in which the project is located must approve and levy the assessments to be made by a vote of two-thirds of its members. If a board that undertakes a project finds that the project may benefit lands in this state outside water resource district boundaries, the board shall provide notice to the water resource board where the benefited lands are located. The board of each water resource district containing lands benefited by a project must approve the project and assessment by vote of two-thirds of its members. The board of county commissioners in each county that contains lands benefited by a project must approve and levy the assessment to be made by vote of two-thirds of its members. If a project and assessment is not approved by all affected water resource boards and boards of county commissioners, the board of each water resource district and the board of county commissioners of each county shall meet to ensure that all common water management problems are jointly addressed. In addition, the water resource board that undertakes the project may proceed with the project if the board finances the cost of the project and does not assess land outside of the district. Before an assessment may be levied under this section, a public hearing must be held. The hearing must be preceded by notice as to date, time, location, and subject matter published in the official newspaper in the county or counties in which the proposed assessment is to be levied. The notice must be published at least ten days but not more than thirty days before the public hearing.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 745, § 1; 2003, ch. 555, § 1; 2007, ch. 555, § 1; 2009, ch. 598, § 1; 2013, ch. 482, § 2.

61-16.1-41.
Permit to drain waters required — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 642, § 13.

61-16.1-41.1.
Removal or placement of fill.

Prior to removing or placing any fill adjacent to a watercourse, the person responsible shall provide written notice to the district describing the amount and type of fill to be placed or removed and the location of the activity.

For purposes of this section, “adjacent” means within two hundred feet [60.96 meters] of the bank of the body of water during normal flow or stage.

The requirements of this section do not apply to surface coal mining and reclamation operations for which a permit has been secured from the public service commission pursuant to chapter 38-14.1.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 754, § 1.

61-16.1-42.
Drains along and across public roads and railroads.

Drains may be laid along, within the limits of, or across any public road or highway, but not to the injury of such road. In instances where it is necessary to run a drain across a highway, the department of transportation, the board of county commissioners, or the board of township supervisors, as the case may be, when notified by the water resource board to do so, shall make necessary openings through the road or highway at its own expense, and shall build and keep in repair all required culverts or bridges as provided under section 61-16.1-43. In instances where drains are laid along or within the rights of way of roads or highways, the drains shall be maintained and kept open by and at the expense of the water resource district concerned. A drain may be laid along any railroad when necessary, but not to the injury of the railroad, and when it is necessary to run a drain across the railroad, the railroad company, when notified by the water resource board to do so, shall make the necessary opening through such railroad, shall build the required bridges and culverts, and shall keep them in repair.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

Cross-References.

Drains along and across public roads and railroads, see N.D.C.C. § 61-21-31.

61-16.1-43.
Construction of bridges and culverts — Costs.

The water resource board shall construct such bridges or culverts over or in connection with a drain as in its judgment may be necessary to furnish passage from one part to another of any private farm or tract of land intersected by such drain. The cost of such construction shall be charged as part of the cost of constructing the drain, and any such bridge, culvert, or passageway shall be maintained under the authority of the water resource board, and the necessary expense shall be deemed a part of the cost of maintenance.

Whenever any bridge or culvert is to be constructed on a county or township highway system over and across or in connection with a drain, the cost of constructing such bridge or culvert shall be shared in the following manner:

The state water commission may, if funds are available, participate in accordance with such rules and regulations as it may prescribe. The remaining cost shall be borne forty percent by the county and sixty percent by the district which has created the need for such construction.

If, however, moneys have not been made available to the commission for participation in accordance with subsection 1, then forty percent of the cost of a bridge or culvert shall be paid by the county and sixty percent shall be charged as the cost of the drain to the district.

Where such bridges or culverts are constructed with federal financial participation, the costs exceeding the amount of the federal participation shall be borne by the district and county according to the provisions of this section, as the case may be.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-44.
Culvert and pipe arch bids and acceptance.

A water resource board may advertise for bids to supply culverts and pipe arches and may accept one or more low bids. A board may utilize bids for such materials received by the county within which the board has jurisdiction and may accept one or more low bids. The board may then purchase materials from the accepted low bidder or bidders for a period of one year from the date of the original acceptance of the bids.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

Cross-References.

Bids to supply culverts and pipe arches, advertising, acceptance, see N.D.C.C. § 61-21-32.1.

Preferences in public purchases, see N.D.C.C. § 44-08-01.

61-16.1-45.
Maintenance of drainage projects.

If it is desired to provide for maintenance of an assessment drain in whole or in part by means of special assessments, the levy in any year for the maintenance may not exceed four dollars per acre [.40 hectare] on any agricultural lands benefited by the drain. The district, at its own discretion, may utilize either of the following methods for levying special assessments for the maintenance:

Agricultural lands that carried the highest assessment when the drain was originally established, or received the most benefits under a reassessment of benefits, may be assessed the maximum amount of four dollars per acre [.40 hectare]. The assessment of other agricultural lands in the district must be based upon the proportion that the assessment of benefits at the time of construction or at the time of any reassessment of benefits bears to the assessment of the benefits of the agricultural land assessed the full four dollars per acre [.40 hectare]. Nonagricultural property must be assessed the sum in any one year as the ratio of the benefits under the original assessments or any reassessment bears to the assessment of agricultural lands bearing the highest assessment.

Agricultural lands must be assessed uniformly throughout the entire assessed area. Nonagricultural property must be assessed an amount not to exceed two dollars for each five hundred dollars of taxable valuation of the nonagricultural property.

In case the maximum levy or assessment on agricultural and nonagricultural property for any year will not produce an amount sufficient to cover the cost of cleaning out and repairing the drain, a water resource board may accumulate a fund in an amount not exceeding the sum produced by the maximum permissible levy for six years.

If the cost of, or obligation for, the cleaning and repairing of any drain exceeds the total amount that may be levied by the board in any six-year period, the board shall obtain the approval of the majority of the landowners as determined by chapter 61-16.1 before obligating the district for the costs.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1985, ch. 681, § 1; 1995, ch. 592, § 1; 2007, ch. 556, § 1; 2013, ch. 482, § 3.

61-16.1-46.
Establishing new drains in location of invalid or abandoned drain.

If any of the proceedings for the location, establishment, or construction of any drain under the provisions of this chapter shall have been enjoined, vacated, set aside, declared void, or voluntarily abandoned by the water resource board, for any reason whatsoever, the board may proceed under the provisions of sections 61-16.1-17 through 61-16.1-22 to locate, establish, and construct a new drain at substantially the same location as the abandoned or invalid drain. For the purposes of this chapter, a drain that is not properly maintained shall be considered abandoned. When a new drain is established at substantially the same location, the board shall ascertain the real value of services rendered, moneys expended and work done under the invalid or abandoned proceedings, and the extent to which the same contributes to the construction and completion of the new drain. The board shall then issue warrants in an amount not exceeding the value to the new drain of the work completed on the invalid or abandoned drain and shall deliver such new warrants, pro rata, to the owners or holders of old warrants or bonds issued under the invalid or abandoned drainage proceedings, upon the surrender of such old warrants or bonds by the holder or holders thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

Cross-References.

Establishment of drain at site of abandoned or invalid drain, see N.D.C.C. § 61-21-41.

61-16.1-47.
Drain kept open and in repair by water resource board.

All assessment drains that have been constructed in any district, except township drains, shall be under the charge of the water resource board and it shall be the duty of the board to keep those drains open and in good repair. It shall be the mandatory duty of the board, within the limits of available funds, to clean out and repair any assessment drain when requested to do so by petition of the affected landowners having fifty percent or more of the possible votes, as determined according to section 61-16.1-20.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

Cross-References.

Contracts for cleaning and repairing drains, see N.D.C.C. § 61-21-45.

Duty to keep drain open and in repair, see N.D.C.C. § 61-21-42.

61-16.1-48.
Assessment of costs of cleaning and repairing drains.

The cost of cleaning out and repairing an assessment drain or a drainage structure constructed by any governmental entity for which no continuing funds for maintenance are available must be assessed pro rata against the lands benefited in the same proportion as the original assessment of the costs in establishing such drain, or in accordance with any reassessment of benefits if there has been a reassessment of benefits under the provisions of section 61-16.1-26. If no assessment for construction costs or reassessment of benefits has been made, the water resource board shall make assessments for the cost of cleaning and repairing such drain or drainage structure constructed by any governmental entity for which no continuing funds for maintenance are available in accordance with the provisions of this chapter for the establishment of a new project. The governing body of any incorporated city, by agreement with the board, is authorized to contribute to the cost of cleaning out, repairing, and maintaining a drain in excess of the amount assessed under this section, and such excess contribution may be expended for such purposes by the board.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1987, ch. 743, § 1.

Cross-References.

Assessment of costs of cleaning and repairing drains, see N.D.C.C. § 61-21-43.

61-16.1-49.
Petition for a lateral drain — Bond of petitioners.

For the purposes of this section, “lateral drain” means a drain constructed after the establishment of an original assessment drain or drainage system and which flows into such original drain or drainage system from outside the limits of the assessed area of the original drain; provided, that a determination by a water resource board as to whether an existing or proposed drain is a lateral or a new drain shall be conclusive when entered upon the records of the board.

All property owners whose property would be affected by a lateral drain may jointly petition the board for the construction of such drain and shall deposit with the board a good and sufficient bond to be approved by the board, conditioned upon the petitioner or petitioners paying all costs of the proposed lateral drain. A petition for a lateral drain shall be sufficient if signed by one or more property owners whose property will be affected by the lateral drain. Whenever improvements of an original drain are made necessary by the construction of a lateral drain, the costs of such improvements to the original drain shall be charged as part of the cost of construction of the lateral drain and assessed against the property benefited thereby and collected as other assessments are collected. In the event the board determines that improvements to the original drain are also beneficial to property served by the original drain, the board may assess that portion of the cost of the improvements it determines appropriate to property benefited by the original drain. Unless the petitioners agree to construct the lateral drain, the board, within ten days, may commence proceedings for the construction of the lateral drain according to the provisions of this chapter. No person shall dig or construct any lateral ditch or drain which will conduct the flow of water from any land or lands into any drain constructed under the provisions of this chapter, except as provided in this section and with approval of the board. In all instances involving the construction of a lateral drain, the board shall estimate and determine the proportionate share of the cost of the main or original drain which should be paid by the petitioners. The petitioners shall pay into the district treasury the amount so determined, and shall then be allowed to connect such lateral ditches or drains with the original drain under the direction and superintendence of the board, but at their own cost and expense. The money paid into the county treasury shall be credited to the drainage fund of the specific drain involved.

If one or more of the property owners to be benefited by the construction of a lateral drain or ditch petitions the district for the construction of a lateral drain or ditch, the district shall then proceed in the same manner as is used for the establishment of a new drain and thereafter such lateral drain shall constitute a part of the original drain to which it is connected and the affected property shall be a part of such drainage district.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

Cross-References.

Petition for lateral drain, see N.D.C.C. § 61-21-39.

61-16.1-50.
Drains having a common outlet may be consolidated.

Whenever one or more drains which have from time to time been constructed, empty into a drain that supplies the outlet for waters flowing in all such drains, such drains may by resolution or order of the water resource board, if the cost of construction of such drains has been paid, be consolidated into one drain or drainage system and shall be renumbered and may be renamed.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

Cross-References.

Consolidation of drains with common outlet, see N.D.C.C. § 61-21-63.

61-16.1-51.
Removal of obstructions to drain — Notice and hearing — Appeal — Injunction — Definition.

If a water resource board determines that an obstruction to a drain has been caused by the negligent act or omission of a landowner or tenant, the board shall notify the landowner by registered mail at the landowner’s post-office address of record. A copy of the notice must also be sent to the tenant, if any. The notice must specify the nature and extent of the obstruction, the opinion of the board as to its cause, and must state that if the obstruction is not removed within such period as the board determines, but not less than fifteen days, the board shall procure removal of the obstruction and assess the cost of the removal, or the portion the board determines appropriate, against the property of the landowner responsible. The notice must also state that the affected landowner, within fifteen days of the date the notice is mailed, may demand, in writing, a hearing on the matter. Upon receipt of the demand, the board shall set a hearing date within fifteen days from the date the demand is received. In the event of an emergency, the board may immediately apply to the appropriate district court for an injunction prohibiting a landowner or tenant from maintaining an obstruction. Assessments levied under the provisions of this section must be collected in the same manner as other assessments authorized by this chapter. If, in the opinion of the board, more than one landowner or tenant has been responsible, the costs may be assessed on a pro rata basis in accordance with the proportionate responsibility of the landowners. A landowner aggrieved by action of the board under this section may appeal the decision of the board to the district court of the county in which the land is located in accordance with the procedure provided in section 28-34-01. A hearing as provided for in this section is not a prerequisite to an appeal. If a complaint is frivolous in the discretion of the board, the board may assess the costs of the frivolous complaint against the complainant. If the obstruction is located in a road ditch, the timing and method of removal must be approved by the appropriate road authority before the notice required by this section is given and appropriate construction site protection standards must be followed.

For the purposes of this section, “an obstruction to a drain” means a barrier to a watercourse, as defined by section 61-01-06, or an artificial drain, including if the watercourse or drain is located within a road ditch, which materially affects the free flow of waters in the watercourse or drain.

Following removal of an obstruction to a drain, either by a water resource board or by a party complying with an order of a water resource board, the board may assess its costs against the property of the responsible landowner.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1989, ch. 83, § 27; 1999, ch. 540, § 1; 2007, ch. 557, § 1; 2013, ch. 482, § 4.

Cross-References.

Removal of obstructions from drains, procedure, see N.D.C.C. § 61-21-43.1.

61-16.1-52.
Closing a noncomplying drain — Notice and hearing — Appeal — Injunction. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 642, § 13.

61-16.1-53.
Removal of a noncomplying dike, dam, or other device — Notice and hearing — Appeal — Injunction.

Upon receipt of a complaint of unauthorized construction of a dike, dam, or other device for water conservation, flood control, regulation, watershed improvement, or storage of water, the water resource board shall promptly investigate and make a determination thereon. If the board determines that a dike, dam, or other device, capable of retaining, obstructing, or diverting more than fifty acre-feet [61674.08 cubic meters] of water or twenty-five acre-feet [30837.04 cubic meters] of water for a medium-hazard or high-hazard dam, has been established or constructed by a landowner or tenant contrary to this title or any rules adopted by the board, the board shall notify the landowner by certified mail at the landowner’s post-office address of record. A copy of the notice must also be sent to the tenant, if any. The notice must specify the nature and extent of the noncompliance and must state that if the dike, dam, or other device is not removed within the period the board determines, but not less than fifteen days, the board shall cause the removal of the dike, dam, or other device and assess the cost of the removal, or the portion the board determines, against the property of the landowner responsible. The notice must also state that the affected landowner, within fifteen days of the date the notice is mailed, may demand, in writing, a hearing upon the matter. Upon receipt of the demand, the board shall set a hearing date within fifteen days from the date the demand is received. In the event of an emergency, the board may immediately apply to the appropriate district court for an injunction prohibiting the landowner or tenant from constructing or maintaining the dike, dam, or other device, or ordering the landowner to remove the dike, dam, or other device. Assessments levied under this section must be collected in the same manner as other assessments authorized by this chapter. If, in the opinion of the board, more than one landowner or tenant has been responsible, the costs may be assessed on a pro rata basis in proportion to the responsibility of the landowners. If a complaint is frivolous in the discretion of the board, the board may assess the costs of the frivolous complaint against the complainant.

Following removal of an unauthorized dike, dam, or other device, either by a water resource board or by a party complying with an order of a water resource board, the board may assess its costs against the property of the responsible landowner.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1989, ch. 83, § 28; 1999, ch. 540, § 2; 2003, ch. 550, § 4; 2013, ch. 482, § 5; 2013, ch. 484, § 1.

61-16.1-53.1.
Appeal of board decisions — Department of water resources review — Closing of noncomplying dams, dikes, or other devices for water conservation, flood control, regulation, and watershed improvement.

The board shall make the decision required by section 61-16.1-53 within a reasonable time, not exceeding one hundred twenty days, after receiving the complaint. The board shall notify all parties of its decision by certified mail. Any aggrieved party may appeal the board’s decision to the department of water resources. The appeal to the department must be made within thirty days from the date notice of the board’s decision has been received. The appeal must be made by submitting a written notice to the department which must state specifically the reason why the board’s decision is erroneous. The appealing party also shall submit copies of the written appeal notice to the board and to all nonappealing parties. Upon receipt of this notice the board, if it has ordered removal of a dam, dike, or other device, is relieved of its obligation to procure the removal of the dam, dike, or other device. The department shall handle the appeal by conducting an independent investigation and making an independent determination of the matter. The department may enter property affected by the complaint to investigate the complaint.

If the board fails to investigate and make a determination concerning the complaint within a reasonable time, not exceeding one hundred twenty days, the person filing the complaint may file the complaint with the department of water resources within one hundred fifty days of the submittal date of the original complaint. Without reference to chapter 28-32, the department shall cause the investigation and determination to be made, either by action against the board or by conducting the investigation and making the determination.

If the department of water resources determines a dam, dike, or other device has been constructed or established by a landowner or tenant contrary to title 61 or any rules adopted by the board, the department shall take one of these three actions:

Notify the landowner by certified mail at the landowner’s post-office address of record;

Return the matter to the jurisdiction of the board along with the investigation report; or

Forward the dam, dike, or other device complaint and investigation report to the state’s attorney.

If the department of water resources decides to notify the landowner, the notice must specify the nature and extent of the noncompliance and state that if the dam, dike, or other device is not removed within a reasonable time as determined by the department, but not less than thirty days, the department shall procure the removal of the dam, dike, or other device and assess the cost of removal against the responsible landowner’s property. The notice from the department also must state that, within fifteen days of the date the notice is mailed, the affected landowner may demand, in writing, a hearing on the matter. Upon receipt of the demand, the department shall set a hearing date within fifteen days from the date the demand is received. If, in the opinion of the department, more than one landowner or tenant has been responsible, the costs may be assessed on a pro rata basis in proportion to the responsibility of the landowners. Upon assessment of costs, the department shall certify the assessment to the county auditor of the county where the noncomplying dam, dike, or other device is located. The county auditor shall extend the assessment against the property assessed. Each assessment must be collected and paid as other property taxes are collected and paid. Assessments collected must be deposited with the state treasurer and credited to the contract fund established by section 61-02-64.1. Any person aggrieved by action of the department under this section may appeal the decision of the department to the district court under chapter 28-32. A hearing by the department as provided for in this section is a prerequisite to an appeal.

If the department of water resources, after completing the investigation required under this section, decides to return the matter to the board, a complete copy of the investigation report must be forwarded to the board and must include the nature and extent of the noncompliance. Upon having the matter returned to its jurisdiction, the board shall carry out the department’s decision under the terms of this section.

If the department of water resources, after completing the investigation required under this section, decides to forward the dam, dike, or other device complaint to the state’s attorney, a complete copy of the investigation report must also be forwarded and must include the nature and extent of the noncompliance. The state’s attorney shall prosecute the complaint under the statutory responsibilities prescribed in chapter 11-16.

In addition to the penalty imposed by the court on conviction under this statute, the court shall order the dam, dike, or other device removed within a reasonable time period as the court determines, but not less than thirty days. If the dam, dike, or other device is not removed within the time prescribed by the court, the court shall procure the removal of the dam, dike, or other device, and assess the cost against the property of the landowner responsible, in the same manner as other assessments under chapter 61-16.1 are levied. If, in the opinion of the court, more than one landowner or tenant has been responsible, the costs may be assessed on a pro rata basis in proportion to the responsibility of the landowners.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 541, § 1; 2013, ch. 484, § 2; 2015, ch. 473, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 488, § 152, effective August 1, 2021.

61-16.1-54.
Appeal from decision of water resource board — Undertaking — Jurisdiction.

An appeal may be taken to the district court from any order or decision of the water resource board by any person aggrieved. An appellant shall file an undertaking in the sum of two hundred dollars with such sureties as may be approved by the clerk of the district court to which the appeal is taken. The undertaking must be conditioned that the appellant will prosecute the appeal without delay and will pay all costs adjudged against the appellant in the district court. The undertaking must be in favor of the water resource board as obligee, and may be sued on in the name of the obligee. The appeal must be taken to the district court of the county in which the land claimed to be affected adversely by the order or decision appealed from is located and is governed by the procedure provided in section 28-34-01.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1989, ch. 83, § 29.

Cross-References.

Drainage project decisions of board, appeal from, see N.D.C.C. §§ 61-21-17, 61-21-18.

61-16.1-55.
Appeal from decision of water resource board — How to be taken. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 83, § 36.

Note.

For present provisions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 28-34.

61-16.1-56.
Time for taking appeal from water resource board decision. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 83, § 36.

Note.

For present provisions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 28-34.

61-16.1-57.
Filing appeal — Docketing and hearing appeals — Final judgment and sending back. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 83, § 36.

Note.

For present provisions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 28-34.

61-16.1-58.
Attorney general to assist boards — Employment of counsel.

The attorney general shall render legal opinions or such other assistance to water resource boards as is required to be rendered to state officers by section 54-12-01. The water resource board, however, may employ other counsel to advise and represent it in such actions and appeals and in its proceedings.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-59.
Proceedings to confirm contracts, special assessments, and other acts.

Any water resource board, before making any contract, or before levying special assessments, or issuing special assessment warrants, or before taking any special action, may commence a special proceeding in district court by which the proceeding leading up to the making of such contract, levying special assessments, issuing special assessment warrants, or leading up to any other special action, shall be judicially examined, approved, and confirmed. Such judicial proceedings shall comply substantially with the procedure required in the case of judicial confirmation of proceedings, acts, and contracts of an irrigation district.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-60.
Authorization to organize association of water resource districts.

Water resource districts, organized and established pursuant to this chapter, are authorized upon resolution of the water resource boards to organize and participate in an association of districts.

The association or associations authorized hereunder shall be organized pursuant to chapter 10-33.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1997, ch. 105, § 12.

61-16.1-61.
Water resource districts — Assumption of assets and liabilities of drain boards.

Beginning on July 1, 1981, each water resource district shall assume all assets, liabilities, and obligations of any county drain board whose territory is included within the boundaries of the district. When the jurisdiction of any county drain board is included within two or more districts, the county auditor shall determine the apportionment of any assets, liabilities, and obligations. Such apportionment shall be based on the proportionate amount of taxable valuation included in each district, except that special assessment projects and funds, property interests, and physical assets attached to the land shall be assumed by the district in which the project is located. Property interests and physical assets attached to the land shall be assumed by the district in which they are located. Prior to February 1, 1983, and for review by each affected water resource board, each water resource district and county drain board shall have a certified public accountant prepare a final audit of its financial records, including all special assessment funds and obligations, assets, and other liabilities. All necessary actions to accomplish the transfer of assets and obligations under this section shall be complete prior to January 1, 1982.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-62.
Validating organization and acts of water resource districts and county drain boards.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as impairing, invalidating, or in any manner affecting the validity of acts or proceedings of water resource districts or county drain boards which existed prior to the passage and approval of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-63.
Penalty for violation of chapter.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall, if no other criminal penalty is specifically provided, be guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

Cross-References.

Penalties for classified offenses, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.